Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4078.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [604.501] CAUSE OF ACTION FOR MISAPPROPRIATION OF AN INDIVIDUAL'S NAME, LIKENESS, OR VOICE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Likeness" means the actual or simulated representation or image of a particular individual, regardless of the means of creation, that is readily identifiable as the individual by virtue of the individual's face or other distinguishing characteristics or from other information displayed in connection with the likeness. new text end new text begin (c) "Voice" means a sound in any medium containing the actual voice or a simulation of the voice of a particular individual, whether recorded or computer generated, to the extent that the individual depicted or simulated is readily identifiable from the sound of the voice, the simulation of the voice, or from other information displayed in connection with the voice. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Rights provided. new text end new text begin An individual has an exclusive property right in the use of the individual's name, likeness, or voice in any medium in any manner. This right may be freely transferred, assigned, or licensed to another person. This right does not expire upon the death of the individual but is descendible to the individual's executors, assigns, heirs, or devisees. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Civil action created; duration; tolling of statute of limitations. new text end new text begin (a) An individual or other person with rights to an individual's name, likeness, or voice may bring a civil action for misappropriation in district court against a person who uses the individual's name, likeness, or voice for commercial purposes without the written authorization of either the individual or the other person with rights to the individual's name, likeness, or voice. new text end new text begin (b) The civil action in paragraph (a) survives for a period of ten years following the death of the individual whose name, likeness, or voice is used. If a plaintiff is able to demonstrate authorized commercial use of the individual's name, likeness, or voice within eight years following the death of the individual, the ten-year survival period must be extended for an additional five years following the individual's death. The survival of the civil action may be further renewed for additional five-year periods if the plaintiff can demonstrate authorized commercial use of the individual's name, likeness, or voice during the two-year period preceding the expiration of each additional five-year period, provided that no action may be maintained 70 years or more following the death of the individual. new text end new text begin (c) In a civil action brought under paragraph (a), the statute of limitations is tolled until the plaintiff discovers the misappropriation. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Damages; equitable relief. new text end new text begin (a) In a civil action for misappropriation under subdivision 3, the court may award the following damages to a prevailing plaintiff: new text end new text begin (1) general and special damages, including all financial losses due to the misappropriation; new text end new text begin (2) an amount equal to any profit that the person liable earned from the misappropriation; and new text end new text begin (3) court costs, fees, and reasonable attorney fees. new text end new text begin (b) The court may, in its discretion, award a prevailing plaintiff three times the amount of damages assessed under paragraph (a), clauses (1) and (2), if the person liable is found to have knowingly misappropriated the individual's name, likeness, or voice. new text end new text begin (c) A court may issue a temporary or permanent injunction, restraining order, or other equitable relief as it deems necessary or appropriate to prevent further harm to the plaintiff. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Liability; exceptions. new text end new text begin (a) To the extent the use is protected by the First Amendment to the United States Constitution, a person's use of an individual's name, likeness, or voice does not violate this section if the use is: new text end new text begin (1) in connection with any news, public affairs, or sports broadcast or account; new text end new text begin (2) for purposes of comment, criticism, scholarship, satire, or parody; new text end new text begin (3) a representation or impersonation of the individual as the individual's self, unless the representation or impersonation is intended to and does create the false impression that the representation or impersonation is the authentic individual; new text end new text begin (4) fleeting or incidental; or new text end new text begin (5) in an advertisement or commercial announcement for a work otherwise protected under this paragraph. new text end new text begin (b) Whether the use of a name, likeness, or voice constitutes use for commercial purpose where the use is commercially sponsored or contains paid advertising is a question of fact and depends on whether the use of the individual's name, likeness, or voice was so directly connected with the commercial sponsorship or with the paid advertising as to constitute commercial use. new text end new text begin (c) Nothing in this section applies to the owners or employees of any commercial medium, including but not limited to newspapers, magazines, radio and television stations, billboards, and transit advertisements, who have published or disseminated any material in violation of this section unless the owners or employees knew or reasonably should have known the misappropriation of the individual's name, likeness, or voice was prohibited by this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Relation to other law. new text end new text begin Nothing in this section shall be construed to abolish, diminish, or alter any other remedy or affect the right of any person to bring a legal action available under any other provision of state or federal law, including common law, to redress harms arising from the use of an individual's name, likeness, or voice. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Jurisdiction; venue. new text end new text begin (a) A court has jurisdiction over a cause of action under this section if the plaintiff or defendant resides in this state. new text end new text begin (b) A cause of action under this section may be filed in either the county of residence of the defendant or the plaintiff. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to causes of action accruing on or after that date. new text end